Utah statutes.
17-30-6.   Examinations -- How prepared, conducted, and graded -- Notice of
examination.
(1) (a)  When necessary, the commission shall give competitive examinations to
determine the qualification of applicants for positions as peace officers.
(b)  The examinations shall be practical in character and shall relate to
matters that will fairly test the mental and physical ability and knowledge of
the applicants to discharge the duties of the positions.
(c)  The examinations shall be prepared, conducted, and graded under the
direction of the commission, or by impartial special examiners if the
commission finds it necessary.
(2) (a)  Notice of examination shall be:
(i) (A)  published one time not less than 15 days before the examination in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area concerned; and
(B)  published, in accordance with Section 45-1-101, for 15 days before the
examination; and
(ii)  posted in a conspicuous place in the office of the department concerned.
(b)  The notice shall set forth minimum and maximum wages, physical and
educational requirements, and passing grades, which shall be not less than
70%.
(c)  A person completing an examination shall be promptly notified by mail at
his last known address of his final grade.
